Hawaii statutes.
§226-106 Affordable housing. Priority
guidelines for the provision of affordable housing:

(1) Seek to use marginal or nonessential agricultural
land and public land to meet housing needs of low- and moderate-income and
gap-group households.

(2) Encourage the use of alternative construction and
development methods as a means of reducing production costs.

(3) Improve information and analysis relative to land
availability and suitability for housing.

(4) Create incentives for development which would increase
home ownership and rental opportunities for Hawaii's low- and moderate-income
households, gap-group households, and residents with special needs.

(5) Encourage continued support for government or
private housing programs that provide low interest mortgages to Hawaii's people
for the purchase of initial owner- occupied housing.

(6) Encourage public and private sector cooperation
in the development of rental housing alternatives.

(7) Encourage improved coordination between various
agencies and levels of government to deal with housing policies and
regulations.

(8) Give higher priority to the provision of quality
housing that is affordable for Hawaii's residents and less priority to
development of housing intended primarily for individuals outside of Hawaii. [L
1986, c 276, §33; am L 1989, c 250, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next